languagetool-language-modules/ast/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Va irar íra/XxV1V2 irar
SFX Va irar íren/XxV1V2 irar
SFX Va irar íran/XxV1V2 irar
SFX Va irchar írches/XxV7V8 irchar
SFX Va irchar írcha/XxV1V2 irchar
SFX Va irchar írchen/XxV1V2 irchar
SFX Va irchar írchan/XxV1V2 irchar
SFX Va irgar írgues/XxV7V8 irgar
SFX Va irgar írga/XxV1V2 irgar
SFX Va irgar írguen/XxV1V2 irgar
SFX Va irgar írgan/XxV1V2 irgar
SFX Va iriar íries/XxV7V8 iriar
SFX Va iriar íria/XxV1V2 iriar
SFX Va iriar írien/XxV1V2 iriar
SFX Va iriar írian/XxV1V2 iriar
SFX Va irlar írles/XxV7V8 irlar
SFX Va irlar írla/XxV1V2 irlar
SFX Va irlar írlen/XxV1V2 irlar
SFX Va irlar írlan/XxV1V2 irlar
SFX Va irllar írlles/XxV7V8 irllar
SFX Va irllar írlla/XxV1V2 irllar
SFX Va irllar írllen/XxV1V2 irllar
SFX Va irllar írllan/XxV1V2 irllar
SFX Va irmar írmes/XxV7V8 irmar
SFX Va irmar írma/XxV1V2 irmar
SFX Va irmar írmen/XxV1V2 irmar
SFX Va irmar írman/XxV1V2 irmar
SFX Va irpiar írpies/XxV7V8 irpiar
SFX Va irpiar írpia/XxV1V2 irpiar
SFX Va irpiar írpien/XxV1V2 irpiar
SFX Va irpiar írpian/XxV1V2 irpiar
SFX Va irrar írres/XxV7V8 irrar
SFX Va irrar írra/XxV1V2 irrar
SFX Va irrar írren/XxV1V2 irrar
SFX Va irrar írran/XxV1V2 irrar
SFX Va irriar írries/XxV7V8 irriar
SFX Va irriar írria/XxV1V2 irriar
SFX Va irriar írrien/XxV1V2 irriar
SFX Va irriar írrian/XxV1V2 irriar
SFX Va isar íses/XxV7V8 isar
SFX Va isar ísa/XxV1V2 isar
SFX Va isar ísen/XxV1V2 isar
SFX Va isar ísan/XxV1V2 isar
SFX Va isbar ísbes/XxV7V8 isbar
SFX Va isbar ísba/XxV1V2 isbar
SFX Va isbar ísben/XxV1V2 isbar
SFX Va isbar ísban/XxV1V2 isbar
SFX Va iscar ísques/XxV7V8 iscar
SFX Va iscar ísca/XxV1V2 iscar
SFX Va iscar ísquen/XxV1V2 iscar
SFX Va iscar íscan/XxV1V2 iscar
SFX Va isgar ísgues/XxV7V8 isgar
SFX Va isgar ísga/XxV1V2 isgar
SFX Va isgar ísguen/XxV1V2 isgar
SFX Va isgar ísgan/XxV1V2 isgar
SFX Va islar ísles/XxV7V8 islar
SFX Va islar ísla/XxV1V2 islar
SFX Va islar íslen/XxV1V2 islar
SFX Va islar íslan/XxV1V2 islar
SFX Va isllar íslles/XxV7V8 isllar
SFX Va isllar íslla/XxV1V2 isllar
SFX Va isllar ísllen/XxV1V2 isllar
SFX Va isllar ísllan/XxV1V2 isllar
SFX Va ismar ísmes/XxV7V8 ismar
SFX Va ismar ísma/XxV1V2 ismar
SFX Va ismar ísmen/XxV1V2 ismar
SFX Va ismar ísman/XxV1V2 ismar
SFX Va ismiar ísmies/XxV7V8 ismiar
SFX Va ismiar ísmia/XxV1V2 ismiar
SFX Va ismiar ísmien/XxV1V2 ismiar
SFX Va ismiar ísmian/XxV1V2 ismiar
SFX Va isnar ísnes/XxV7V8 isnar
SFX Va isnar ísna/XxV1V2 isnar
SFX Va isnar ísnen/XxV1V2 isnar
SFX Va isnar ísnan/XxV1V2 isnar
SFX Va ispar íspes/XxV7V8 ispar
SFX Va ispar íspa/XxV1V2 ispar
SFX Va ispar íspen/XxV1V2 ispar
SFX Va ispar íspan/XxV1V2 ispar
SFX Va ispiar íspies/XxV7V8 ispiar
SFX Va ispiar íspia/XxV1V2 ispiar
SFX Va ispiar íspien/XxV1V2 ispiar
SFX Va ispiar íspian/XxV1V2 ispiar
SFX Va istar ístes/XxV7V8 istar
SFX Va istar ísta/XxV1V2 istar
SFX Va istar ísten/XxV1V2 istar
SFX Va istar ístan/XxV1V2 istar
SFX Va istiar ísties/XxV7V8 istiar
SFX Va istiar ístia/XxV1V2 istiar
SFX Va istiar ístien/XxV1V2 istiar
SFX Va istiar ístian/XxV1V2 istiar
SFX Va istrar ístres/XxV7V8 istrar
SFX Va istrar ístra/XxV1V2 istrar
SFX Va istrar ístren/XxV1V2 istrar
SFX Va istrar ístran/XxV1V2 istrar
SFX Va isviar ísvies/XxV7V8 isviar
SFX Va isviar ísvia/XxV1V2 isviar
SFX Va isviar ísvien/XxV1V2 isviar
SFX Va isviar ísvian/XxV1V2 isviar
SFX Va isñar ísñes/XxV7V8 isñar
SFX Va isñar ísña/XxV1V2 isñar
SFX Va isñar ísñen/XxV1V2 isñar
SFX Va isñar ísñan/XxV1V2 isñar
SFX Va itar ítes/XxV7V8 itar
SFX Va itar íta/XxV1V2 itar
SFX Va itar íten/XxV1V2 itar
SFX Va itar ítan/XxV1V2 itar
SFX Va itiar íties/XxV7V8 itiar
SFX Va itiar ítia/XxV1V2 itiar
SFX Va itiar ítien/XxV1V2 itiar
SFX Va itiar ítian/XxV1V2 itiar
SFX Va itrar ítres/XxV7V8 itrar
SFX Va itrar ítra/XxV1V2 itrar
SFX Va itrar ítren/XxV1V2 itrar
SFX Va itrar ítran/XxV1V2 itrar
SFX Va ivar íves/XxV7V8 ivar
SFX Va ivar íva/XxV1V2 ivar
SFX Va ivar íven/XxV1V2 ivar
SFX Va ivar ívan/XxV1V2 ivar
SFX Va iviar ívies/XxV7V8 iviar
SFX Va iviar ívia/XxV1V2 iviar
SFX Va iviar ívien/XxV1V2 iviar
SFX Va iviar ívian/XxV1V2 iviar
SFX Va ixar íxes/XxV7V8 ixar
SFX Va ixar íxa/XxV1V2 ixar
SFX Va ixar íxen/XxV1V2 ixar
SFX Va ixar íxan/XxV1V2 ixar
SFX Va iyar íyes/XxV7V8 iyar
SFX Va iyar íya/XxV1V2 iyar
SFX Va iyar íyen/XxV1V2 iyar
SFX Va iyar íyan/XxV1V2 iyar
SFX Va izar íces/XxV7V8 izar
SFX Va izar íza/XxV1V2 izar
SFX Va izar ícen/XxV1V2 izar
SFX Va izar ízan/XxV1V2 izar
SFX Va izcar ízques/XxV7V8 izcar
SFX Va izcar ízca/XxV1V2 izcar
SFX Va izcar ízquen/XxV1V2 izcar
SFX Va izcar ízcan/XxV1V2 izcar
SFX Va iznar íznes/XxV7V8 iznar
SFX Va iznar ízna/XxV1V2 iznar
SFX Va iznar íznen/XxV1V2 iznar
SFX Va iznar íznan/XxV1V2 iznar
SFX Va iñar íñes/XxV7V8 iñar
SFX Va iñar íña/XxV1V2 iñar
SFX Va iñar íñen/XxV1V2 iñar
SFX Va iñar íñan/XxV1V2 iñar
SFX Va obar óbes/XxV7V8 obar
SFX Va obar óba/XxV1V2 obar
SFX Va obar óben/XxV1V2 obar
SFX Va obar óban/XxV1V2 obar
SFX Va obiar óbies/XxV7V8 obiar
SFX Va obiar óbia/XxV1V2 obiar
SFX Va obiar óbien/XxV1V2 obiar
SFX Va obiar óbian/XxV1V2 obiar
SFX Va oblar óbles/XxV7V8 oblar
SFX Va oblar óbla/XxV1V2 oblar
SFX Va oblar óblen/XxV1V2 oblar
SFX Va oblar óblan/XxV1V2 oblar
SFX Va obrar óbres/XxV7V8 obrar
SFX Va obrar óbra/XxV1V2 obrar
SFX Va obrar óbren/XxV1V2 obrar
SFX Va obrar óbran/XxV1V2 obrar
SFX Va ocar óques/XxV7V8 ocar
SFX Va ocar óca/XxV1V2 ocar
SFX Va ocar óquen/XxV1V2 ocar
SFX Va ocar ócan/XxV1V2 ocar
SFX Va ochar óches/XxV7V8 ochar
SFX Va ochar ócha/XxV1V2 ochar
SFX Va ochar óchen/XxV1V2 ochar
SFX Va ochar óchan/XxV1V2 ochar
SFX Va ociar ócies/XxV7V8 ociar
SFX Va ociar ócia/XxV1V2 ociar
SFX Va ociar ócien/XxV1V2 ociar
SFX Va ociar ócian/XxV1V2 ociar
SFX Va oclar ócles/XxV7V8 oclar
SFX Va oclar ócla/XxV1V2 oclar
SFX Va oclar óclen/XxV1V2 oclar
SFX Va oclar óclan/XxV1V2 oclar
SFX Va odar ódes/XxV7V8 odar
SFX Va odar óda/XxV1V2 odar
SFX Va odar óden/XxV1V2 odar
SFX Va odar ódan/XxV1V2 odar
SFX Va odiar ódies/XxV7V8 odiar
SFX Va odiar ódia/XxV1V2 odiar
SFX Va odiar ódien/XxV1V2 odiar
SFX Va odiar ódian/XxV1V2 odiar
SFX Va odrar ódres/XxV7V8 odrar
SFX Va odrar ódra/XxV1V2 odrar
SFX Va odrar ódren/XxV1V2 odrar
SFX Va odrar ódran/XxV1V2 odrar
SFX Va ofar ófes/XxV7V8 ofar
SFX Va ofar ófa/XxV1V2 ofar
SFX Va ofar ófen/XxV1V2 ofar
SFX Va ofar ófan/XxV1V2 ofar
SFX Va ofiar ófies/XxV7V8 ofiar
SFX Va ofiar ófia/XxV1V2 ofiar
SFX Va ofiar ófien/XxV1V2 ofiar
SFX Va ofiar ófian/XxV1V2 ofiar
SFX Va oflar ófles/XxV7V8 oflar
SFX Va oflar ófla/XxV1V2 oflar
SFX Va oflar óflen/XxV1V2 oflar
SFX Va oflar óflan/XxV1V2 oflar
SFX Va ofrar ófres/XxV7V8 ofrar
SFX Va ofrar ófra/XxV1V2 ofrar
SFX Va ofrar ófren/XxV1V2 ofrar
SFX Va ofrar ófran/XxV1V2 ofrar
SFX Va ogar ógues/XxV7V8 ogar
SFX Va ogar óga/XxV1V2 ogar
SFX Va ogar óguen/XxV1V2 ogar
SFX Va ogar ógan/XxV1V2 ogar
SFX Va ograr ógres/XxV7V8 ograr
SFX Va ograr ógra/XxV1V2 ograr
SFX Va ograr ógren/XxV1V2 ograr
SFX Va ograr ógran/XxV1V2 ograr
SFX Va oh.ar óh.es/XxV7V8 oh.ar
SFX Va oh.ar óh.a/XxV1V2 oh.ar
SFX Va oh.ar óh.en/XxV1V2 oh.ar
SFX Va oh.ar óh.an/XxV1V2 oh.ar
SFX Va ohar óhes/XxV7V8 ohar
SFX Va ohar óha/XxV1V2 ohar
SFX Va ohar óhen/XxV1V2 ohar
SFX Va ohar óhan/XxV1V2 ohar
SFX Va oidar óides/XxV7V8 oidar
SFX Va oidar óida/XxV1V2 oidar
SFX Va oidar óiden/XxV1V2 oidar
SFX Va oidar óidan/XxV1V2 oidar
SFX Va olar óles/XxV7V8 olar
SFX Va olar óla/XxV1V2 olar
SFX Va olar ólen/XxV1V2 olar
SFX Va olar ólan/XxV1V2 olar
SFX Va olcar ólques/XxV7V8 olcar
SFX Va olcar ólca/XxV1V2 olcar
SFX Va olcar ólquen/XxV1V2 olcar
SFX Va olcar ólcan/XxV1V2 olcar
SFX Va olchar ólches/XxV7V8 olchar
SFX Va olchar ólcha/XxV1V2 olchar
SFX Va olchar ólchen/XxV1V2 olchar
SFX Va olchar ólchan/XxV1V2 olchar
SFX Va oldar óldes/XxV7V8 oldar
SFX Va oldar ólda/XxV1V2 oldar
SFX Va oldar ólden/XxV1V2 oldar
SFX Va oldar óldan/XxV1V2 oldar
SFX Va oldiar óldies/XxV7V8 oldiar
SFX Va oldiar óldia/XxV1V2 oldiar
SFX Va oldiar óldien/XxV1V2 oldiar
SFX Va oldiar óldian/XxV1V2 oldiar
SFX Va oldrar óldres/XxV7V8 oldrar
SFX Va oldrar óldra/XxV1V2 oldrar
SFX Va oldrar óldren/XxV1V2 oldrar
SFX Va oldrar óldran/XxV1V2 oldrar
SFX Va olfar ólfes/XxV7V8 olfar
